Utah statutes.
76-8-712.   Re-entry of campus or facility after denial of access as
condition of suspension or dismissal -- Presumption of knowledge.
(1) Every student or employee who, after a hearing, has been suspended or
dismissed from an institution of higher education for disrupting the orderly
operation of a campus or facility and as a condition of suspension or
dismissal has been denied access to the campus or facility of the institution
for the period of the suspension or for a period not to exceed one year in the
case of dismissal, who has been served by registered or certified mail at the
last address given by the person with a written notice of suspension or
dismissal and condition; and who willfully and knowingly enters upon the
campus or facility of the institution to which he has been denied access
without the express written permission of the chief administrative officer is
guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in Section 76-8-717.
(2)  Knowledge shall be presumed if notice has been given as prescribed in
this section. The presumption established by this section is a presumption
affecting the burden of proof.
